Maine, session 132, LD1230.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2016, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 678, §1 and reallocated by RR
2023, c. 2, Pt. A, §40, is repealed.
SUMMARY
This bill repeals the requirement that a seller of firearms wait 72 hours before
delivering a purchased firearm to the buyer.
Page 1 - 132LR1281(01)